Louisiana, session 2026, HB422.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Part III of Chapter 3 of Title 23 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 23:271 through 278, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
PART III. BEHIND THE COUNTER SAFETY ACT
§271. Short Title
This Part shall be known and may be cited as the "Behind the Counter Safety
Act".
§272. Definitions
As used in this Part, the following terms have the meanings ascribed to them:
(1) "Department" means Louisiana Works.
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-635 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 422
(2)(a) "Regulated establishment" means any retail store, convenience store,
pharmacy, restaurant, fast food outlet, gas station with a food or retail counter, or
other licensed commercial establishment in this state where employees regularly
interact with the public at a service counter or cash register for the sale of goods or
food for consumption on or off premises.
(b) "Regulated establishment" does not include establishments primarily
engaged in office-based or nonpublic-facing operations and regulated entities as
provided for in R.S. 40:2199.11 et seq.
(3) "Workplace violence" means any act of violence or credible threat of
violence, including but not limited to assault, battery, robbery, intimidation, verbal
abuse, threats with a weapon, or any conduct that places an employee in reasonable
fear of physical harm, directed at the employee while performing duties at the
establishment.
§273. Workplace violence prevention plans; requirements
A. Each regulated establishment shall develop, implement, and maintain a
written workplace violence prevention plan specific to its location and operations.
B. The workplace violence prevention plan shall include, at a minimum, all
of the following:
(1) Procedures for identifying and assessing potential risks that may lead to
workplace violence, such as handling cash payments, working night shifts, working
at isolated counters, or working in high crime areas.
(2) Engineering controls and safety measures, such as panic buttons, bullet-
resistant enclosures, adequate lighting, clear sight lines to entrances and exits, video
surveillance, drop safes to limit accessible cash, time delay safes, and audible alarms.
(3) Administrative controls, such as employee training on de-escalation,
recognizing warning signs, emergency procedures, and response protocols.
(4) A system for incident reporting, investigation, and correction action.
(5) Procedures for post-incident support, including access to counseling or
leave.
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-635 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 422
C. Each regulated establishment shall review and update its workplace
violence prevention plan at least annually and after any significant incident.
D. All employees, including temporary and part-time employees, shall
receive orientation and annual training on the workplace violence prevention plan.
§274. Signage required
A. Each regulated establishment shall display at its premises at least one sign
that conforms to the specifications of Subsection B of this Section and contains the
following statement in forty-eight boldface font:
"WARNING: Violence, threats, or abuse against an employee is a crime and will not be
tolerated. Such acts may result in arrest and felony conviction under Louisiana law."
B. Each sign displayed in accordance with the requirements of this Section
shall conform to all of the following specifications:
(1) The sign shall be posted in a conspicuous location and visible to the
public near the entrance and counter area.
(2) The sign shall be at least eleven inches tall by eighteen inches wide.
§275. Incident reporting required
A. Each regulated establishment shall report any instances of workplace
violence to local law enforcement and to its internal reporting system as provided in
the workplace violence prevention plan.
B. If the incident results in an injury, involves a weapon, or poses an
immediate threat to safety, the regulated establishment shall notify the department
as soon as practicable, however no later than twenty-four hours after the incident,
and provide details for tracking trends.
C. The department shall maintain aggregated, anonymized data on all
reported incidents.
§276. Workplace violence; public information and resources
A. The department shall develop, publish, and maintain public information
regarding the issue of workplace violence in retail and food service establishments
on its website.
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-635 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 422
B. The information provided by the department pursuant to this Section shall
include, at a minimum, all of the following:
(1) A listing of best practices, toolkits, and resources on the issue of
workplace violence from governmental and private authorities, including without
limitation, the Occupational Safety and Health Administration, the National Institute
for Occupational Safety and Health, and other organizations that report on
occupational health and safety regulations.
(2) Actions that regulated establishments may take and policies such
establishments may adopt to prevent, respond to, report, and mitigate workplace
violence.
(3) A checklist of items for regulated establishments to consider when
developing a workplace violence prevention plan.
(4) A downloadable example of text that complies with the provisions of
R.S. 23:274 relative to signage requirements.
(5) A mechanism for anonymous reporting for noncompliance.
§277. Retaliation in connection with reporting workplace violence; prohibition
No regulated establishment shall discharge, demote, suspend, threaten,
harass, or otherwise retaliate against any employee for good faith reporting of
workplace violence, cooperating in an investigation, or participating in prevention
activities. The employee protections provided for in this Section shall be in addition
to, and shall not replace, any protections conferred by the provisions of this Title.
§278. Enforcement; penalties
A. The department shall inspect regulated establishments to ensure
compliance with the provisions of this Part and issue citations for any violations of
this Part. The department is authorized and directed to promulgate rules and
regulations in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act as necessary for the
implementation of the provisions of this Part.
B. Whoever commits the offense of unlawful disruption of the operation of
a regulated establishment shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars or
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-635 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 422
imprisoned with or without hard labor, for not less than one year nor more than five
years, or both.